Massachusetts, session 194th, S2851.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
An Act establishing natural organic reduction in the Commonwealth
SECTION 1. Section 14A of Chapter 85 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking the word “and” the third time it appears and by
adding the following after the word “handling,” the fourth time it appears:- ; and (f) conducting
natural organic reduction.
SECTION 2. Section 82 of Chapter 112 is hereby further amended by striking the word
“and” the sixth time it appears and by adding the following words after the word “handling,” the
fourth time it appears:- ; and (f) conducting natural organic reduction.
SECTION 3. Said section of said chapter is hereby further amended by adding the
following words after the word “embalming” the fifth time it appears:- , or natural organic
reduction
of 4

SECTION 4. Said section of said chapter is hereby further amended by adding the
following definitions:
“Natural Organic Reduction”, The contained, accelerated conversion of human remains
into a soil-like product.
“Natural Organic Reduction Operator”, An individual trained and certified in natural
organic reduction.
SECTION 5. Section 83 of chapter 112 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by adding the following paragraph at the end thereof:-
A registered funeral director, embalmer or registered apprentice embalmer may also be
registered as a natural organic reduction operator or facilitator after completing satisfactory
course instruction in natural organic reduction. The board shall have the authority to determine
satisfactory course instruction. The board shall also have the authority to determine additional
requirements necessary for natural organic reduction operator certification.
SECTION 6. Section 84 of Chapter 112 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by striking the words “funeral directing or embalming” both times they appear and
putting in place thereof the following words:- funeral directing, embalming, or natural organic
reduction
SECTION 7. Section 85 of Chapter 112 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by inserting after the word embalming, the first time it appears, the following words:-
“, natural organic reduction”
of 4

SECTION 8. Said section of said Chapter is hereby further amended by inserting after the
word embalming, the second time it appears, the following words:- “ or natural organic
reduction”
SECTION 9. Said section of said Chapter is hereby further amended by inserting after the
word embalming, the third time it appears, the following words:- “, natural organic reduction”
SECTION 10. Section 85A of Chapter 112 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
hereby amended by inserting after the word “director,” each time it appears, the following
words:- “natural organic reduction operator”
SECTION 11. Section 86 of Chapter 112 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by inserting after the word “directing” the following words:- "every holder of a
certificate of registration in natural organic reduction,”
SECTION 12. Section 87 of Chapter 112 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by inserting after the word “bodies” the following words:-, or shall engage in the
profession of natural organic reduction,
SECTION 13. Said section of said chapter, as so appearing, is further amended by
inserting after the word “embalming” the second time it appears, the following words:- “, natural
organic reduction”
SECTION 14. Said chapter is hereby further amended by inserting at the end thereof the
following section:-
Section 290. Natural Organic Reduction
of 4

A corporation may operate a natural organic reduction facility to engage in the practice of
natural organic reduction through the employment of natural organic reduction operators. Said
corporations shall receive operating licensure from the Division of Occupational Licensure. The
Board of Registration in Embalming and Funeral Directing, in consultation with the Division of
Occupational Licensure and the Department of Public Health, shall promulgate rules and
regulations for the administration of natural organic reduction facility and operator licenses
which shall include operational standards, personnel qualifications, environmental safeguards,
and testing for pathogens and toxic materials.
A natural organic reduction facility shall not be bound by any ownership interest
threshold that exists for licensed funeral establishments.
SECTION 15. Section 14 of Chapter 113A of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
hereby amended by adding the words “Natural organic reduction” after the word “embalming”
both times it appears.
of 4